Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Aviation, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 4,596,296
(2) Aircraft registration ................. $ 166,706
(3) Pavement maintenance ............. $ 1,705,828
(4) General aviation
entitlement
grant program........................... $ 446,784
(5) Aviation system
action program ......................... $ 9,719,459
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Aviation,
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 2,082,276
(2) General aviation
entitlement
grant program........................... $ 4,336,856
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5504 (SB 5504-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5504 (SB 5504-A) Page 2